Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.070

Waiver of notice.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person may waive notice under this chapter in a record signed by the person or person's attorney and filed in the proceeding.

(2) A respondent, individual subject to guardianship, individual subject to conservatorship, or individual subject to a protective arrangement under Article 5 of this chapter may not waive notice under this chapter.

[ 2019 c 437 s 114.]